District of Columbia statutes.
1-1431

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

Repealed.

(3)

“Costs” includes obligations incurred before September 18, 2007.

(4)

“DC-NET program” means a program conducted by the Office of the Chief Technology Officer to implement and manage a state-of-the-art, fiber-optic network owned by the District government.

(5)

Repealed.

(6)

Repealed.

History

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 1002, 54 DCR 7052
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1042(a), 60 DCR 12472

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 repealed (1), (2), (5), and (6).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1002 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1042(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1042(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1001 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle A of title I of the act may be cited as the “Technology Services Support Act of 2007”.

Section 1041 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle E of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Technology Services Support Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.